Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 6 Fees
21-6-404. Acts 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1710.3.

21-6-405. Acts 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1710.4.

A clerk of a county court may charge the following maximum fees:

For filing a bond of any contractor.10

For reading and filing every petition and recording the order to be made thereon, for every one hundred (100) words.20

For making copy of petition, order, and other papers pertaining thereto, for every one hundred (100) words.20

For reading and filing a remonstrance against any road or bridge.25

For each certificate of appointment of road reviewers.25

For issuing a precept of inquiry of damages in the case of

roads.50

For entering order for the appointment of a justice of the peace to apportion hands to work on roads, and copy of same, for every one hundred (100) words.20

For entering the appointment of each overseer of aroad.25

For each notice to overseers and justices of the peace.25

For entering each order concerning the erection or repairing of any county building, for every one hundred (100) words.20

For entering the appointment of any commissioner to superintend the erection or repairing of any county building, for every one hundred (100) words .20

For issuing the certificate of appointment to commissioner

.50

For entering every order for ascertaining any county line, for every one hundred (100) words.20

For recording a return of any survey of a county line, for every one hundred (100) words.20

For entering every order fixing the place of holding elections, for every one hundred (100) words.20

For entering every order for the support of a poor person, for every one hundred (100) words.20

For all services required to be performed relating to the laying out of a township, or altering township lines 1.00

For trying and sealing any weight or measure, to be paid by the applicant.50

For taking, filing, and safekeeping of any bond required by law to be filed in his or her office, not otherwise provided for.25

For making settlements of each account with the county, to be paid to the county clerks for the official account record of the various accounts of the county treasurers and collectors, for each receipt entered on each account.10

For filing each county treasurer's and collector'sreceipt.10

For all services rendered in the filing of a claim against the county general and road accounts, and the issuing of the first warrant thereon.75

For each additional warrant issued on the same claim.50

For issuing each writ, receiving, filing, and docketing return

.50

For recording marks or brands 1.00

For filing each paper not specified in this section, except county claims.10

For administering each oath.25

For swearing each jury.50

For copies of records and papers not provided for in this section, for each one hundred (100) words or figures.20

For taking and entering verdict of jury.25

For entering judgments, except allowances against the county, for each one hundred (100) words.20

For commission to take depositions 1.00

For indexing each case on record.10

For entering all appeals except on assessmentsrecords.25

For every certificate and seal not provided for in this section

.50

For every subpoena or summons to witnesses.50

For recording every paper not provided for in this section, for each one hundred (100) words.20

For entering on record the appraised value of estray, and filing bond and appraisement.75

For filing and approving bond for marriage license.50

For filing, recording, and certifying copy of marriage license after its return.50

For each coupon of marriage license furnished registrar of vital statistics, to be retained by clerk in addition to salary.10

For all services in issuing general licenses, licenses to hawkers, ferries, taverns, peddlers, auctioneers, circuses, menageries, or other public exhibitions for which a license is by law required. Shows or public exhibitions may only be licensed for twelve (12) days or less for one (1) license fee 2.00

For filing abstracts of witnesses before grand jury.10

For entering the judgment of the court on an abstract 1.00

For issuing each certificate of land redemption 1.00

For each additional tract on certificate of landredemption.25

For cancelling each warrant, to be paid by funds upon which warrants are drawn.10

The county clerk shall receive for services under the revenue laws for each settlement he or she makes with a clerk, sheriff, constable, or inferior collecting officer for fines, penalties, licenses, forfeitures, and seal tax by them, for which they are required to settle in full one (1) time each quarter.75

For auditing each account in collector's and treasurer's record quarterly.75

For each abstract forwarded to the Auditor of State and to the Director of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education 1.00

For making out the original tax books, for every one hundred (100) words, counting one (1) figure as a word, but excluding calculations not carried into the tax records.20

For each copy thereof, for every one hundred (100) words, counting each figure as a word, as aforesaid.20

For furnishing copy of delinquent lands to printer for each tract.10

For attending sales of delinquent lands and making records thereof, for each tract for sale.10

For each additional tract.10

For transferring land to name of purchaser when sold to an individual.10

For furnishing for publication copy of the delinquent list of delinquent and insolvent personal taxpayers, for each name.10

For recording delinquent list of personal property, for every one hundred (100) words.20

For making each certificate of lands sold to the state and not redeemed to Commissioner of State Lands 5.00

For making settlement with collector for each day employed including quarterly apportionments, not exceeding thirty (30) days during entire calendar year, per day 5.00

For furnishing Auditor of State with an abstract of tax

records 3.00

For making a deed to the purchaser of lands sold at delinquent sale, one (1) tract per deed 1.00

For waiting on county courts and the probate and juvenile divisions of circuit court, per day10.00.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment substituted “and the probate and juvenile divisions of circuit court” for “probate courts, and juvenile courts” in (65).

The 2013 amendment rewrote the introductory language of present (a) and added (b).

The 2017 amendment added (c).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (a)(52).

Cross References. City clerk to receive same fees as county clerk in attesting papers, §14-43-406.

Where the tax books were partially made out by the county clerk then in office and completed by his successor in office, in a controversy between the two as to the division of the fees for the work, the county was only bound to the payment for the tax books, and where the county clerk who delivered the tax books to the collector was satisfied with the fees as apportioned by the clerk, the former clerk would not have been heard to complain. Allen v. Clark County, 108 Ark. 498, 158 S.W. 155 (1913) (decision under prior law).

The county clerk was entitled to a fee for issuing warrants not signed or delivered. St. Francis County v. Folbre, 66 Ark. 91, 48 S.W. 1070 (1899) (decision under prior law).

Where, in a proceeding for calling in county warrants for allowance and reissuance, 2,247 warrants were presented by 700 different persons and the county court ordered 2,113 new warrants to be issued in lieu thereof, the clerk was entitled to a fee for the allowance and indexing of only 700 claims. Duncan v. Scott County, 70 Ark. 607, 70 S.W. 314 (1902) (decision under prior law).

Clerk was entitled to fee for service in cancelling and redeeming county warrants, it being a service which the law requires him to perform, and the fee for services where no other fee was specifically provided was that fixed by statute. Baker v. State ex rel. Independence County, 201 Ark. 652, 147 S.W.2d 17 (1941) (decision under prior law).

A county clerk was not entitled to a fee for each warrant paid and presented by the county treasurer for allowance in his annual settlements with the county. Johnson County v. Bunch, 63 Ark. 315, 38 S.W. 518 (1896) (decision under prior law).

The county was not liable for the fees of the county clerk in entering an order of appointment of special bailiffs. Logan County v. Trimm, 57 Ark. 487, 22 S.W. 164 (1893) (decision under prior law).

The county was not liable for the fee for filing a claim against the county. Prairie County v. Vaughan, 64 Ark. 203, 41 S.W. 420 (1897) (decision under prior law).

A county was not liable for the county clerk's fee for filing county warrants for allowance and reissuance. Duncan v. Scott County, 70 Ark. 607, 70 S.W. 314 (1902) (decision under prior law).

The fee for making a deed to the purchaser of lands forfeited and sold for delinquent taxes is required to be paid by the purchaser and not by the county. Sanderson v. Williams, 142 Ark. 91, 218 S.W. 179 (1920) (decision under prior law).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning masters in chancery and justices of the peace, were repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1185, §§ 262 and 263 respectively. The sections were derived from the following sources:

21-6-408. Acts 1875, No. 77, § 14, p. 167; C. & M. Dig., § 4580; Pope's Dig., § 5665; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1711.

21-6-409. Acts 1875, No. 77, § 32, p. 167; 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 58, § 12, p. 103; C. & M. Dig., § 4599; Pope's Dig., § 5688; Acts 1947, No. 221, § 2; 1969, No. 307, § 1; 1969, No. 657, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1731, 12-1731.1; Acts 1987, No. 445, § 1.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning prosecuting and city attorneys, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1256, § 20, as amended by Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1875, No. 77, § 4, p. 167; 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 58, § 1, p. 103; C. & M. Dig., § 4571; Init. Meas. 1936, No. 3, § 37, Acts 1937, p. 1384; Pope's Dig., §§ 4121, 5655; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1707, 12-1708; Acts 1989, No. 796, § 1; 1991, No. 904, §§ 15, 20.

A.C.R.C. Notes. For codification of the Arkansas Criminal Code, see the “meaning of ‘this code’” note at §5-1-101.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment inserted “or other forms of presentment involving the transmission of account information” in the section heading and throughout the section; substituted “Section” for “Ark. Code Ann. §” in (a)(3); rewrote (b)(1); deleted former (b)(2) and redesignated former (b)(3) through (b)(5) as present (b)(2) through (b)(4); and made gender neutral and stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “fifteen dollars ($15.00)” in (b)(1); substituted “forty-five dollars ($45.00)” for “thirty dollars ($30.00)” in (b)(2); substituted “sixty-five dollars ($65.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)” in (b)(3); and substituted “ninety dollars ($90.00)” for “seventy-five dollars ($75.00)” in (b)(4).

The 2015 amendment substituted “that” for “which” in (a); added “or” in (a)(1); substituted “§5-37-301 et seq.” for “§§5-37-301 –5-37-306; or” in (a)(2); and deleted (a)(3).

Moneys deposited into the fund shall be appropriated and expended for the uses designated in this section by the quorum court at the direction of the circuit clerk.

(A)If the county clerk's office is appointed as commissioner for a sale of real or personal property under judicial decree, the fee awarded to the county clerk's office under this section shall be:

Collected by the county clerk and paid into the county treasury to the credit of a fund to be known as the “county clerk commissioner's fee fund”; and

Used exclusively by the county clerk's office for the following purposes and in the following order:

To offset administrative costs associated with the performance of the commissioner's duties; and

For general operational expenses of the office of county clerk.

Moneys deposited into the county clerk commissioner's fee fund shall be appropriated and expended for the uses designated in this section by the quorum court at the direction of the county clerk.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment deleted former (b); redesignated former (c) as present (b); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment inserted leaders in the table in (a)(1); and added (c).

The 2015 amendment redesignated (c)(1) as (c)(1)(A) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly and added (c)(2).

The circuit clerk is an ex officio commissioner and the salary allowed him as clerk covers the entire compensation fixed by law for all duties performed by him as clerk or as commissioner ex officio. State ex rel. Lonoke County v. Swaim, 167 Ark. 225, 268 S.W. 366 (1925).

A chancery clerk commissioner appointed for the purpose of selling property involved in a divorce action was entitled only to a fee of $52, pursuant to the specified provision of this section, where the property sold for $52,000; the clerk was not entitled to collect a fee of $600 which was purportedly awarded to him pursuant to §16-13-313 since §16-13-313 expressly exempts cases where the compensation may now or hereafter be fixed by law. Valley Nat'l Bank v. Stroud, 289 Ark. 284, 711 S.W.2d 785 (1986).

Where the commissioner's fee exceeded the amount allowed by this section and the record did not reflect that the defendant ever waived an objection to the fee, the fee was reduced to the statutory amount. Meeks v. Meeks, 290 Ark. 563, 721 S.W.2d 653 (1986).

Miscellaneous court fees are established as follows:

With respect to probate matters, this section applies to circuit clerks and any county clerk who serves as ex officio clerk of the probate division of the circuit court.

Any fee not specifically provided for in subsection (a) of this section shall be set by the circuit court if it is a probate matter or by the county judge if it is a county court matter.

The fee provisions provided for in subsection (a) of this section shall be in lieu of any or all fees now established by law.

(1)(A)Fees collected under this section shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the fund to be known as the “county clerk's cost fund”.

With the exception of those funds referred to in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, all funds deposited into the county clerk's cost fund are general revenues of the county and may be used for any legitimate county purpose.

(A)At least thirty-five percent (35%) of the moneys collected annually shall be used to purchase, maintain, and operate an automated records system.

The acquisition and update of software for the automated records system shall be a permitted use of these funds.

Funds set aside for automation may be allowed to accumulate from year to year or at the discretion of the clerk may be transferred to the county general fund by a budgeted appropriated transfer.

(A)(i)In those counties having combined offices of circuit clerk and county clerk, the clerk shall elect to use the automation fund authorized by this section or the automation fund allowed by the county recorder's cost fund, §21-6-306.

In those counties having combined offices of county clerk and recorder, the clerk shall elect to use the automation fund authorized by this section or the automation fund allowed by the county recorder's cost fund, § 21-6-306.

The clerk's election shall be made in writing and filed in the office of the circuit clerk.

Under no circumstances shall the clerk be allowed to use both the automation fund as authorized by § 21-6-306 and the county clerk's cost fund as authorized in this subchapter, except for the revenue generated under § 16-20-407(b).

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (e)(3)(C), added “except for the revenue generated under §16-20-407(b)” and made a related and a minor stylistic change.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning probate and county matters and uniform court costs, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 102. The section was derived from Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 260.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The language originally assigned to §21-6-405 by Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 260, is identical to the language added to this subchapter by Acts 2003, No. 1765, § 29. Consequently the two act provisions were both codified as this section.

Cross References. Fee for filing a district report or affidavit, §16-20-408.

The uniform filing fees to be charged by the clerks of the county court for initiating a cause of action in the county court shall be thirty dollars ($30.00), and no portion of the filing fee shall be refunded.

No county shall authorize, and no county court clerk shall assess or collect, any other filing fees other than those authorized unless specifically provided by state law.

The provisions of § 21-6-413(e) shall apply to filing fees collected under this section.

(1)The court technology fee to be charged by the clerks of the Supreme Court, circuit courts, and district courts of this state shall be as prescribed in this section.

The court technology fee is as follows:

(1)The fee provided under subdivision (b)(1) of this section collected in the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals shall be remitted by the Clerk of the Supreme Court on or before the fifteenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section on a form provided by the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration for deposit into the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-712.

No fee shall be charged or collected by the clerks of the circuit or district courts when the court by order, under Rule 72 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure, allows an indigent person to prosecute a cause of action in forma pauperis.

Prosecuting attorneys filing actions on behalf of the state, with the exception of child support cases, are exempt from paying fees under this section.

Fees under this section shall not be charged or collected in cases brought in the circuit court under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., by a governmental entity or nonprofit corporation, including without limitation an attorney ad litem appointed in a dependency-neglect case or the Department of Human Services.

As used in this section, “circuit court clerk” means the circuit clerk and with respect to probate matters any county clerk who serves as ex officio clerk of the probate division of the circuit court.

Cross References. Legal Education Fund, §6-64-601 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1875, No. 77, § 53: effective on passage.

Acts 1907, No. 260, § 3: effective on passage.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning depositions and officers, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 726, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1875, No. 77, § 17, p. 167; C. & M. Dig., § 4585; Pope's Dig., § 5671; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1714.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 26, p. 167; 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 58, § 9, p. 103; C. & M. Dig., § 4593; Pope's Dig., § 5681; Acts 1945, No. 271, § 2; 1953, No. 178, § 1; 1959, No. 38, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1727.

21-6-305. Collector of revenue.

The collector of revenue shall be allowed commissions for collecting the revenue and for certifying the amount of real property tax reduction to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State pursuant to §26-26-310, as follows:

All commissions allowed to the collector by this section or any other law shall be paid into the county treasury as general revenues.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 114, § 120 (last par.), p. 199; C. & M. Dig., § 10071; Pope's Dig., § 13832; Acts 1941, No. 120, § 1; 1943, No. 31, § 1; 1949, No. 348, §§ 1, 2; 1951, No. 105, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1726, 12-1726n; Acts 2001, No. 1215, § 1; 2001, No. 1275, § 1; 2003, No. 847, § 1.

21-6-306. Recorders.

(1)The uniform fees to be charged by the recorders in the various counties in this state shall be as follows:

For recording deeds, deeds of trust, mortgages, release deeds, powers of attorney, plats, survey plats, notary bonds, foreign judgments, materialmen's liens, and other recordable instruments, except as otherwise prescribed in this section, fifteen dollars ($15.00) for one (1) page, one (1) side only, and five dollars ($5.00) for each additional page;

For recording mortgage assignments, mortgage releases, and other instruments when multiple instruments are listed in a single document, an additional fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) per instrument listed not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) shall be charged; and

Eight dollars ($8.00) for filing or recording a certificate of assessment or any other instrument not specified in this subsection.

If the recorder waives the requirements of §14-15-402(b)(1) for good cause, the instrument may be recorded for an additional fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(1)All fees collected under this section shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the fund to be known as the “county recorder's cost fund”.

Moneys deposited into this fund shall be appropriated and expended for the uses designated in this section by the quorum court at the direction of the recorder.

Appropriated moneys shall be placed into line items within the recorder's budget as approved by the quorum court.

(1)All moneys collected by the recorder as a fee as provided in this section shall be used by the recorder's office to offset administrative costs.

(A)At least twenty-five percent (25%) of the moneys collected annually shall be used to purchase, maintain, and operate an automated records system. The acquisition and update of software for the automated records system shall be a permitted use of these funds.

At the discretion of the recorder, any funds not needed by the recorder for any of the purposes under this subdivision (c)(2) may be transferred to the county general fund.

Any funds in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) held at any time in the county recorder's cost fund shall be transferred to the county general fund.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 55, § 2; 1963, No. 124, § 1; 1977, No. 333, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1720; Acts 1989, No. 534, § 2; 1995, No. 768, § 1; 2001, No. 1144, § 1; 2003, No. 1339, § 1; 2007, No. 615, § 1; 2009, No. 202, § 1.

21-6-307. Sheriffs.

The following fees shall be charged by each of the sheriffs of the several counties of the State of Arkansas:

(1)Seventy-five percent (75%) of all fees collected by the sheriff shall be paid into the county treasury in the manner provided by law, or to the person entitled to receive the money, or to his or her order, or to his or her attorney of record.

(A)The remaining twenty-five percent (25%) of all fees collected by the sheriff shall be used by the sheriff to establish a special fund to be known as the “communications facility and equipment fund”.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 399, § 1; 1981, No. 256, § 1; 1983, No. 717, § 1; 1985, No. 851, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1722; Acts 1995, No. 662, § 1; 2001, No. 1427, § 1; 2003, No. 1338, § 1; 2015, No. 741, § 3.

21-6-308. Constables.

The quorum court may fix the salary of the constables that are elected within the jurisdiction of the quorum court.

All constables in this state shall collect and account for all fees collected, and the fees shall be deposited with the county treasurer in the constable's jurisdiction not more than thirty (30) days after their collection.

Constables shall collect and account for the following fees:

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 31, p. 167; 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 58, § 11, p. 103; 1885, No. 97, § 1, p. 156; 1885, No. 98, § 2, p. 157; 1899, No. 190, § 1, p. 334; 1903, No. 32, § 1, p. 55; C. & M. Dig., § 4598; Pope's Dig., § 5687; Acts 1947, No. 221, § 1; 1961, No. 472, § 1; 1971, No. 233, § 1; 1973, No. 141, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1730; Acts 2011, No. 561, § 5.

21-6-309. Notaries public.

A notary public authorized to perform notarial acts in this state may charge and collect a fee for a notarial act if the fee:

Is a reasonable amount as determined by the notary public; and

The fee is disclosed to and agreed upon by the client or principal before executing the notarial act.

(1)A notary public who knowingly charges, demands, or receives any fees not provided by law, or who charges, demands, or receives a fee amount that violates subsection (a) of this section, is guilty of a violation.

Upon conviction, the notary public shall be fined no less than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 142, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 5685, 5686; Acts 1969, No. 155, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1733, 12-1739; Acts 1989, No. 304, § 1; 2015, No. 570, § 1; 2017, No. 537, § 1.

21-6-310. Officers and employees generally — Disposition of funds.

(1)All fees, fines, penalties, and other moneys collected by any county officer, deputy, or county employee shall be deposited with the county treasurer on the first day of each month or within ten (10) days thereafter, and, unless otherwise provided by law, shall be placed in the county general fund.

Inmate commissary trust account balances belonging to the inmate and held by the county sheriff are not deemed county funds and are not subject to this section.

The county treasurer shall keep a complete and accurate record of the receipt of such moneys and shall provide a written receipt to the person or office making such a deposit.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 127, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1741; Acts 2013, No. 405, § 2; 2013, No. 1158, § 3; 2015, No. 741, § 4.

Subchapter 4

— Officers of the Court

21-6-401. Clerk of the Supreme Court.

(1)The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be allowed and paid by the appellant or petitioner, in advance, in all civil actions and misdemeanors filed in either the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(A)The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be allowed a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for a certified question from a federal court.

If the decision of the Court of Appeals is reversed by the Supreme Court, the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall tax the fee provided in this subsection in favor of the petitioner.

For each certificate and seal$ 1.00

For acknowledging each deed.50

For copies of papers and records per page.50

For other services, the same fees allowed clerks of the circuit court.

History.

Acts 1851, § 7, p. 89; 1895, No. 145, § 7, p. 213; C. & M. Dig., §§ 2141, 4572, 9776f; Pope's Dig., §§ 2747, 5656, 13315; Acts 1961, No. 132, § 1; 1961, No. 133, § 1; 1981, No. 601, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1709 — 12-1709.2, 22-238; Acts 1993, No. 822, § 1; 2005, No. 1934, § 13; 2007, No. 378, § 1; 2009, No. 328, § 5; 2009, No. 633, § 20.

21-6-402. Circuit court clerks — Miscellaneous fees.

No portion of these fees shall be refunded.

For drawing and issuing, sealing any summons,subpoena$2.50

For writs or executions20.00

For certificate and seal5.00

For making and preparing any transcript:

For filing a certificate of indebtedness issued by the Department of Finance and Administration8.00

For filing a release of a certificate of indebtedness6.00

For an execution on a certificate of indebtedness filed by the Department of Finance and Administration10.00.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 55, § 1; 1977, No. 333, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1710; Acts 1999, No. 1081, § 7; 2003, No. 1765, § 26; 2005, No. 919, § 1; 2005, No. 1934, § 14; 2009, No. 328, § 6; 2011, No. 1145, §
1; 2013, No. 68, § 1.

21-6-403. Circuit court clerks — Uniform filing fees — Definition.

No portion of the filing fees shall be refunded.

For initiating a cause of action in the circuit court, including appeals$150.00

For filing a mortgagee's or trustee's notice of default and intention to sell pursuant to §18-50-104140.00

For reopening a cause of action in the circuit court50.00

For any cause of action which by court order is transferred from any district or circuit court to a circuit court50.00.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 333, § 1; 1981, No. 824, § 2; 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 16, §§ 9, 11; 1981, (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 27, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1710.2; Acts 1989, No. 534, § 1; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 34, § 3; 1995, No. 1256, § 3; 1997, No. 788, § 25; 1997, No. 1341, § 25; 1999, No. 1081, § 4; 2003, No. 1185, § 259; 2003, No. 1765, § 27; 2005, No. 65, § 1; 2005, No. 431, § 1; 2005, No. 1893, § 1; 2007, No. 663, § 15; 2009, No. 475, § 1; 2013, No. 282, § 13; 2019, No. 246, § 1.

21-6-404, 21-6-405. [Repealed.]

For each order to erect or repair bridge$.50

For making out and issuing an order for the appointment of a commissioner to erect or repair any bridge.50

A clerk of a county court shall not charge a fee for filing an appeal from a county equalization board.

A clerk of a county court shall not charge a fee for filing a petition with the county court requesting a refund under §26-35-901.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 309, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1717.1; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 261; 2013, No. 544, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 729, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2346.

21-6-407. Fees of clerks of county courts — Method of payment.

(1)The fees provided for in §21-6-406 shall be paid by the county under the order and direction of the county court.

The county court shall examine and approve each fee account.

If found correct, the county court shall make an order showing the amount due by the county by items and shall direct the clerk to draw his or her warrant on the county treasury for the amount due by the county.

All fees of county clerks for extending the taxes, other than those paid by special improvement districts, shall be paid from the general fund of the county.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 13, p. 167; 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 58, § 6, p. 103; 1887, No. 89, § 1 (last par.), p. 139; 1889, No. 7, § 1, p. 5; C. & M. Dig., § 4578; Acts 1929, No. 172, § 35; Pope's Dig., § 5663; Acts 1947, No. 111, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1719.

21-6-408, 21-6-409. [Repealed.]

21-6-411. Prosecuting attorneys — Certain checks, orders, drafts, or other forms of presentment involving transmission of account information.

A prosecuting attorney may collect a fee if his or her office collects and processes a check, order, draft, or other form of presentment involving the transmission of account information if the check, order, draft, or other form of presentment involving the transmission of account information has been issued or passed in a manner that makes the issuance or passing an offense under the:

Arkansas Criminal Code; or

Arkansas Hot Check Law, §5-37-301 et seq.

A prosecuting attorney may collect a fee from any person issuing a bad check as described in subsection (a) of this section. The amount of the fee shall not exceed:

Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) if the face amount of the check, order, draft, or other form of presentment involving the transmission of account information does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100);

Forty-five dollars ($45.00) if the face amount of the check, order, draft, or other form of presentment involving the transmission of account information is greater than one hundred dollars ($100) but does not exceed three hundred dollars ($300);

Sixty-five dollars ($65.00) if the face amount of the check, order, draft, or other form of presentment involving the transmission of account information is greater than three hundred dollars ($300) but does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500); and

Ninety dollars ($90.00) if the face amount of the check, order, draft, or other form of presentment involving the transmission of account information is greater than five hundred dollars ($500).

If the person from whom the fee is collected was a party to the offense of forgery, under §§5-37-101 and5-37-201 —5-37-214, by altering the face amount of the check, order, draft, or other form of presentment involving the transmission of account information, the face amount as altered governs for purposes of determining the amount of the fee.

Fees collected under this section shall be deposited into a special fund to be administered by the prosecuting attorney.

(1)In those counties in which the sheriff is operating a hot check program and the prosecuting attorney is not operating such a program on September 20, 1985, the sheriff shall be entitled to continue the program as long as he or she elects to do so and the prosecuting attorney shall not initiate any such program in the county unless the sheriff in the county discontinues his or her program.

In those counties in which the sheriff operates a hot check program, the sheriff's office shall be entitled to the same fees as provided in this section, but all fees shall be paid into an account for the sheriff's office and shall be subject to appropriation by the quorum court to be used to defray the cost of the hot check program and other costs of the sheriff's office.

This section is cumulative to all other acts and shall not repeal any other act.

History.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 33, §§ 2-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 67-727, 67-728, 67-728n; Acts 2003, No. 1088, § 1; 2011, No. 997, § 1; 2015, No. 1151, § 1.

21-6-412. Commissioners to sell property.

(1)Commissioners appointed to make sales of real property under judicial decrees shall be allowed the following fees as compensation for such services:

(A) On sales for $ 1.00 to $ 500
$10.00 (B) On sales for 500 to 2,500
15.00 (C) On sales for 2,500 to 5,000
20.00 (D) On sales for 5,000 to 10,000
25.00 (E) On sales for 10,000 to 20,000
30.00 (F) On sales for 20,000 to 35,000
35.00 (G) On sales for 35,000 or more, one-tenth of one percent (0.1%).

Click to view table.

Commissioners appointed to make sales of personal property under judicial decrees shall be allowed as compensation for such services the fee prescribed by the judge of the court that issued the decree.

In lieu of the fees provided for in this section, the court may set reasonable fees for commissioners based upon services rendered on sales under thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(1)(A)If the circuit clerk's office is appointed as commissioner for a sale of real or personal property under judicial decree, the fee awarded to the circuit clerk's office under this section shall be:

Collected by the circuit clerk and paid into the county treasury to the credit of a fund to be known as the “circuit clerk commissioner's fee fund”; and

Used exclusively by the circuit clerk's office for the following purposes and in the following order:

To offset administrative costs associated with the performance of the commissioner's duties; and

For general operational expenses of the office of circuit clerk.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 52, p. 167; 1917, No. 251, § 1, p. 1324; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4581, 4582; Pope's Dig., §§ 5666, 5667; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1712, 12-1713; Acts 1989, No. 32, § 1; 1989, No. 751, § 1; 1995, No. 1296, § 79; 2003, No. 1740, § 1; 2013, No. 291, § 1; 2015, No. 159, § 1.

21-6-413. Probate and county matters — Miscellaneous court fees.

(1) Dissolutions of incorporation
$25.00 (2) Articles of incorporation
25.00 (3) Amendments to articles of incorporation
25.00 (4) Filing last will and testament for safekeeping
5.00 (5) Authentication certificate
5.00 (6) Certify and seal document
5.00 (7) Marriage license
30.00 (8) Certified copy of marriage license
5.00 (9) Underage marriages — Petition and order
10.00 (10) Small estates
25.00 (11) Assumed names
25.00 (12) Limited partnerships
25.00 (13) Alcoholics and insane persons
25.00 (14) Clerk's tax deed
5.00 (15) Recording doctors' and nurses' credentials
5.00 (16) Recording ministers' credentials
5.00 (17) Filing affidavit of claim against an estate
5.00 (18) Filing power of attorney
10.00 (19) Filing and recording all accounts and settlements
50.00 (20) Certified copies of all letters
5.00 (21) Issuing subpoena or summons
5.00 (22) Putting up advertisement of settlement of executors, administrators, and guardians
5.00 (23) Preparing notices of settlements to be published in paper each month
5.00 (24) Filing exceptions
5.00.

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1765, § 28; 2009, No. 348, § 1.

21-6-414. [Repealed.]

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 260; 2003, No. 1765, § 29.

21-6-416. Court clerks — Technology fees — Definition.

No portion of the court technology fee shall be refunded.

For all civil actions and misdemeanors filed in either the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals $15.00

For initiating a cause of action in the civil, domestic relations, or probate division of circuit court, including appeals 15.00

For initiating a cause of action in the civil or small claims division of district court 15.00.

The fee provided under subdivisions (b)(2) and (3) of this section collected in circuit court or district court shall be remitted by the county or city official, agency, or department designated under §16-13-709 as primarily responsible for the collection of fines assessed in circuit court or district court on or before the fifteenth day of each month to the section, on a form provided by the office, for deposit into the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund established by §16-13-712.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 328, § 7.

Subchapter 5

— Miscellaneous Fees

21-6-501. [Repealed.]

For issuing a subpoena or warrant of arrest and for summoning or arresting the witnesses, officers shall be allowed the same fees as are allowed to clerks and sheriffs for similar services.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 18, p. 167; C. & M. Dig., § 4586; Pope's Dig., § 5672; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1715.

21-6-503. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning telephone service of summons or subpoena, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 726, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1907, No. 260, § 2, p. 605; C. & M. Dig., § 4588; Pope's Dig., § 5676; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1723.

21-6-504. Limitation on fees in criminal cases.

In criminal cases where the costs are paid by the county, no sheriff, coroner, constable, or other person serving subpoenas for witnesses shall be allowed to receive from the county pay for making more than two (2) returns on subpoenas in any given case.

In no case shall either of the officers or other person charge or receive pay or mileage in serving any writ, process, or subpoena in a criminal case for more than the actual number of miles traveled.

No clerk or magistrate shall receive pay from any county for the issuance of more than two (2) subpoenas in a criminal case.

When a sheriff arrests a person without a warrant or commitment and conveys him to the county jail, and the person arrested is subsequently indicted and convicted, the sheriff is entitled to no mileage in conveying him to jail. McHenry v. Hot Spring County, 57 Ark. 565, 22 S.W. 175 (1893).

When a sheriff arrests a defendant under one of four warrants in his hands, he is entitled to mileage on only one warrant. McHenry v. Hot Spring County, 57 Ark. 565, 22 S.W. 175 (1893).

“Return,” as used in this section, does not mean “service,” and the county is responsible, in cases for which it is liable to the sheriff, for every subpoena served, however numerous. Phillips County v. Pillow, 47 Ark. 404, 1 S.W. 686 (1886).

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, §§ 20, 33, p. 167; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4589, 4600; Pope's Dig., §§ 5677, 5689; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1724, 12-1732.

21-6-505. Expenses of keeping seized property.

The sheriff, constable, or other officer shall safely keep all property taken or seized under legal process and shall be allowed by the court the necessary expenses of doing so, to be paid by the plaintiff, and taxed in the cost.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 77, § 21; C. & M. Dig., § 4590; Pope's Dig., § 5678; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-1725.

21-6-406. Clerks of county courts — Miscellaneous fees.

21-6-410. [Repealed.]

21-6-415. County court clerks — Uniform filing fees.

21-6-502. Service of subpoena or warrant — Officers.